Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1410
Marketing contracts; breach; rights of association.

The marketing contract of any association formed hereunder may fix as liquidated damages, specific, reasonable sums to be paid by a member to the association upon the breach by him of any of the provisions of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of products, and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premium for bonds, expenses and fees in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association, and any such provision shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state and shall not be construed as a penalty. In the event of a breach or threatened breach of such marketing contract by a member, the association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract, and to a decree for the specific performance hereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 10, p. 252;

C.S.1929, § 24-1410;

R.S.1943, § 21-1410.